Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 1 General Emergency Provisions
58-2-116. Emergency management.

In addition to prevention measures included in the state and local comprehensive emergency management plans, the governor shall consider, on a continuing basis, steps that could be taken to mitigate the harmful consequences of emergencies. At the governor's direction, state agencies, including, but not limited to, those charged with responsibilities in connection with flood plain management, stream encroachment and flow regulation, weather modification, fire prevention and control, air quality, public works, land use and land use planning, and construction standards, shall make studies of emergency mitigation-related matters. The governor, from time to time, shall make such recommendations to the general assembly, local governments, and other appropriate public and private entities as may facilitate measures for mitigation of the harmful consequences of emergencies.

The appropriate state departments or agencies, in conjunction with TEMA, shall continually study the plans, uses and construction of structures and other facilities and identify areas which are particularly susceptible to severe land shifting, subsidence, flood, or other catastrophic occurrence, manmade or natural. The studies under this subsection (b) shall concentrate on means of reducing or avoiding the dangers caused by these occurrences or the consequences thereof.

If TEMA believes, on the basis of the studies or other competent evidence, that:

An area is susceptible to an emergency of catastrophic proportions without adequate warning;

Existing building standards and land use controls in that area are inadequate and could add substantially to the magnitude of the emergency; and

Changes in zoning regulations, other land use regulations, or building requirements are essential in order to further the purposes of this section, the agency shall specify the essential changes to the governor. If the governor, upon review of the recommendation, finds, after public hearing that changes are essential, the governor shall so recommend to the agencies or political subdivision with jurisdiction over the area and subject matter. If no action, or insufficient action, pursuant to the governor's recommendations is taken within the time specified by the governor, the governor shall so inform the general assembly and request legislative action appropriate to mitigate the impact of such an emergency.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-117. Lease or loan of state property; transfer of state personnel.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law:

Whenever the governor deems it to be in the public interest, the governor may:

Authorize any department or agency of the state to lease or lend, on such terms and conditions as it may deem necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of the state, any real or personal property of the state government, to the president of the United States, the heads of the armed forces of the United States, or the various federal emergency management agencies of the United States; and

Enter into a contract on behalf of the state for the lease or loan to any political subdivision of the state, on such terms and conditions as the governor may deem necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of this state, of any real or personal property of the state government, or the temporary transfer or employment of personnel of the state government to or by any political subdivision of the state;

The governing body of each political subdivision of the state may:

Enter into such contract or lease with this state, accept any such loan, or employ such personnel, and such political subdivision may equip, maintain, utilize, and operate any such property and employ necessary personnel therefor in accordance with the purposes for which such contract is executed; and

Do all things and perform any and all acts which it may deem necessary to effectuate the purpose for which such contract was entered into.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Attorney General Opinions. Appointment of county officials, OAG 97-068 (5/12/97).

58-2-118. Orders and rules.

Upon being authorized by the governor, TEMA, or other state department or agency, the political subdivisions of the state and other agencies designated or appointed by the governor, or in the TEMP, are authorized and empowered to make, amend, and rescind such orders and rules as are necessary for emergency management purposes and to supplement the carrying out of this chapter, but which are not inconsistent with any orders or rules adopted by an EMA or by any state agency exercising a power delegated to it by the governor or the agency.

In order to attain uniformity so far as practicable throughout the country in measures taken to aid emergency management, all action taken under this chapter and all orders and rules made pursuant to such sections shall be taken or made with due consideration of the orders, rules, actions, recommendations, and requests of federal authorities relevant thereto and, to the extent permitted by law, shall be consistent with such orders, rules, actions, recommendations, and requests.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-119. Enforcement.

It is the duty of every EMA established pursuant to this chapter and the officers and personnel thereof, to execute and enforce such orders, rules and regulations as may be made by the governor under authority of this chapter. Each such organization shall have available for inspection at its office all orders, rules and regulations made by the governor, or under the governor's authority.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-120. Penalties.

In the event of an emergency declared pursuant to this chapter, any person or representative thereof violating any order, rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. Emergency management powers of political subdivisions, § 58-2-110.

Interstate civil defense and disaster compact, title 58, ch. 2, part 4.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-2-121. Liability.

Any person, public or private, owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege or otherwise permits the designation by TEMA or EMA for the use of the whole or any part of such real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons during an actual, impending, mock, or practice emergency, together with such person's successor in interest, if any, shall not be liable for:

The death of, or injury to, any person on or about such real estate or premises during the actual, impending, mock, or practice emergency; or

Loss of, or damage to, the property of such person, solely by reason or as a result of such license, privilege, designation, or use, unless the gross negligence or the willful and wanton misconduct of such person owning or controlling such real estate or premises or such person's successor in interest is the proximate cause of such death, injury, loss, or damage occurring during such sheltering period.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-122. Liberality of construction.

This part shall be construed liberally in order to effectuate the part's purposes.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-123. Radiological emergency preparedness.

Purpose and intent. It is the purpose of this section to establish the means by which certain radiological emergency response plans and preparedness requirements of the United States nuclear regulatory commission and the federal emergency management agency can be developed and tested by the state, the appropriate counties, and each operator licensed by the United States nuclear regulatory commission to operate a commercial nuclear electric generating facility. It is the express intent of the general assembly that no department, commission, agency, or political subdivision of the state be considered to have assumed or be responsible for the funding of any activity or program required by this section from any sources of funds other than those specifically identified in this section.

Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings indicated:

“Appropriate county” means a county which is required by the United States nuclear regulatory commission or the federal emergency management agency to be designated a risk or a host county;

“Facility” means a commercial nuclear electric generating reactor operated for the purpose of providing heat to produce electricity for sale to persons other than the owner of the facility;

“Operator” means that person who has applied for or who has been granted a license by the United States nuclear regulatory commission for the operation of a facility; and

“Plans” means the radiological emergency response plans and preparedness in support of nuclear power plants requirements, including facilities and equipment, currently contained in nuclear regulatory commission regulation 0654 (NUREG-0654) and FEMA-radiological emergency plan 1 (FEMA-REP-1) or as may be required by cognizant federal agencies in the future.

Emergency response plans. In addition to the other plans required by this chapter, TEMA shall develop, prepare, test, and implement as needed, in conjunction with the appropriate counties and the affected operator, such radiological emergency response plans and preparedness requirements as may be imposed by the United States nuclear regulatory commission or the federal emergency management agency as a requirement for obtaining or continuing the appropriate licenses for a commercial nuclear electric generating facility.

Powers and duties. In implementing the requirements of this section, the director of the agency or the director's designated representative, shall:

Negotiate and enter into such additional contracts and arrangements among the agency, appropriate counties, and each operator to provide for the level of funding and the respective roles of each in the development, preparation, testing, and implementation of the plans;

Evaluate and determine the adequacy of the plans based upon consultations with the United States nuclear regulatory commission and other agencies, as appropriate, and upon the results of such tests as may be conducted;

Limited to such funding as is available based upon the requirements of subdivision (d)(5), require the participation of appropriate counties and operators in the development, preparation, testing, or implementation of the LANs as needed;

Determine the reasonableness and adequacy of the provisions, terms, and conditions of the plans and, in the event the appropriate counties and the operators cannot agree, resolve such differences and require compliance by the appropriate counties and the operators with the plans. In resolving such differences, the director shall consider:

The requirements and parameters placed on the operators by federal law and agencies;

The reasonableness and adequacy of the funding for appropriate counties from any sources of funds other than local revenue sources; and

The reasonableness and appropriateness of the costs to the appropriate counties likely to be incurred in complying with the provisions, terms and conditions of the plans;

Receive, expend, and disburse such funds as are made available by each licensee pursuant to this section; and

Limited to such funding as is available based upon the requirements of subsection (e), coordinate all activities undertaken pursuant to this section or required of appropriate counties and operators by any federal or state agency.

Funding. All funds for the implementation of this section shall be provided by the operators as required by subsection (d), except that operators may enter into bilateral agreements with other state agencies or appropriate counties when necessary. No political subdivision of the state shall be considered to have obligated or consented to have obligated any funds from any local revenue source whatsoever by complying with this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-124. Suspension letter — Contents.

The Tennessee emergency management agency shall deliver a copy of any suspension letter to the member of the senate and the member of the house of representatives who represents such area, and to the principal officer of the local legislative body of the county and municipality, if applicable. Such notice shall contain the date of suspension, the amount of suspension, reasons for the suspension, and the length of suspension. For the purposes of this section, “suspension” includes the suspension of any federal funds or state funds that are related to the emergency management program. A suspension letter shall include a synopsis of the following:

Task forecast agreement;

Quarterly activity reports;

Plans;

Training;

Exercises;

Public awareness;

RADEF equipment checked;

Emergency and missions;

Administrative;

Mitigation programs;

Personnel and facilities; and

Effectiveness.

Acts 2000, ch. 686, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-125. Acceptance of gifts.

The governor, on behalf of the state, may accept a gift of funds from any person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of providing funding for emergency relief services. Gifted funds shall be deposited in the emergency and contingency fund. The emergency and contingency fund may be used for any purpose authorized by law to be allowed on executive order of the governor.

Acts 2006, ch. 942, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-126. First responders from local emergency management agencies — Death benefit.

As used in this section:

“First responders from local emergency management agencies” means emergency management agency personnel, including but not limited to, emergency managers who, as first responders:

Go directly to the scene of an emergency; or

Provide direct logistical support during the emergency and may go to and from a disaster or emergency area; and

“Local emergency management agency” means an organization created in accordance with this chapter to discharge the emergency management responsibilities and functions of a political subdivision.

All local emergency management agency personnel are considered first responders from local emergency management agencies with all the rights, benefits, privileges, and protections available to them pursuant to state and local laws.

The estate of any first responder from a local emergency management agency who is killed in the line of duty is entitled to receive the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), with payment to be made from the general fund after receipt by the department of finance and administration of a certified death certificate and an affidavit from the decedent's employer that the decedent was killed in the line of duty.

Acts 2017, ch. 408, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 408, § 2. July 1, 2017.

58-2-127. Prerequisites for employment as a director of a local emergency management agency.

As a prerequisite to receiving an offer of employment as the director of a local emergency management agency, the candidate shall provide evidence satisfactory to the CLEO that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Is a citizen of the United States and of this state;

Is a high school graduate or possesses equivalency;

Has not been convicted or pled guilty to or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any felony charge;

Has a valid Tennessee driver license; and

Has graduated and received a baccalaureate degree;

Has graduated and received an associate's degree and possesses at least two (2) years experience in an emergency management or related field;

Possesses at least four (4) years experience in an emergency management or related field; or

Is serving as director of a local emergency management agency on July 1, 2011.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), any director of a local emergency management agency shall possess knowledge of the following subjects:

The principles and practices of emergency management;

Emergency management planning concepts;

Disaster response and the functions of government and private organizations;

Laws and regulations related to emergency operations; and

Working knowledge of computer operations and the operation of other basic office equipment.

In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b), any director of a local emergency management agency shall possess the skill and ability to perform tasks as defined by the county mayor, including, but not limited to, the following tasks:

Plan, organize, assign, inspect, and direct the work of others;

Evaluate situations and make coherent decisions;

Express ideas clearly, concisely, and convincingly, both orally and in writing. This requirement includes the ability to communicate effectively under stressful conditions during emergency situations;

Establish and maintain an effective working relationship with the public, businesses, industries, volunteers, and employees;

Operate an emergency management response vehicle and communications equipment;

Work from a mobile unit and outdoors in all types of weather conditions during emergency and simulated situations; and

Direct the activities of a twenty-four-hour, seven-day-a-week operation.

A local emergency management agency director is under executive direction.

A local emergency management agency director's responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:

Coordinate and assist in the revision and update of the local emergency operations plan and field operating guides in conjunction with elected and appointed local government officials and private, volunteer, and civic organizations;

Develop and manage the local agency's annual budget in accordance with local guidelines;

Collect initial disaster intelligence information, extract essential elements of information, and prioritize use of critical resources;

Prepare and transmit situation reports to TEMA as directed by state procedures;

Assess the impact of major emergencies and initiate requests for declaration of emergency for the CLEO's signature;

Serve as the focal point for damage assessment information and coordinate all relief activities through the CLEO and the regional and state emergency operations center;

Promote and supervise the development of various emergency management related public education and information services, such as training programs, brochures, speaking opportunities, and media programs;

Develop and maintain an emergency operations center to ensure direction, control, and continuity of local government during emergencies and disasters;

Conduct hazardous analysis, capability assessment and vulnerability analysis, and make periodic updates to same. The director is “on call” for response to any type of disaster or major emergency: natural, manmade, or technological;

Provide assistance to private sector organizations on issues pertaining to emergency management and homeland security;

Provide resource coordination and technical assistance during major emergencies and disasters;

Prepare after-action reports as required;

Development and implementation of all activities relative to emergency management within the territorial limits of the emergency management area for which the director serves as director;

Establish emergency management standards within the territorial limits of the emergency management area for which the director serves as director. This responsibility includes the development and implementation of activities which support the national incident management system (NIMS) to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from major emergencies, terrorist events, and disasters; and

Perform other duties as directed by the CLEO.

In addition to the duties and responsibilities enumerated in subsection (e), a local emergency management agency director shall:

Complete FEMA independent study (IS) courses in a timely manner as required by TEMA and local guidelines;

Within the first twenty-four (24) months of employment, or, in the case of a person who is serving as director of a local emergency management agency on July 1, 2011, by June 30, 2013, complete the TEMA hazardous materials operations level, damage assessment workshop, and any NIMS courses that are offered during that twenty-four-month period. If the TEMA hazardous materials operations level or damage assessment workshop is not offered during the first twenty-four (24) months of a director's term of employment, or, in the case of a person who is serving as director of a local emergency management agency on July 1, 2011, during the period of July 1, 2011 through June 30, 2013, the director shall take those courses at the earliest opportunity after the expiration of such time period. A director shall attend additional courses that are offered by TEMA as the director's time and schedule permit;

Apply for emergency management professional certifications in a timely manner; and

Independently maintain current knowledge of new technologies related to emergency management.

Acts 2011, ch. 365, § 2; T.C.A. § 58-2-133.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 58-2-133 to § 58-2-127 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

58-2-128.
Development of plan for broadcasters to respond to emergency — Training program for emergency response broadcasters — Access to areas affected by emergency.

A state organization representing the majority of broadcasters in this state, in cooperation with the state and local emergency management agencies, may develop plans for preparing for and responding appropriately to an emergency or disaster.

Any state organization that represents the majority of the state's broadcasters may establish a program for training and certifying broadcast engineers and technical personnel as emergency response broadcasters. Any such program established pursuant to this subsection (b) shall:

Be consistent with the federal law and guidelines;

Provide training and education concerning restoring, repairing, and resupplying any facilities and equipment of a broadcaster in an area affected by an emergency; and

Provide training and education concerning the personal safety of an emergency broadcaster in an area affected by an emergency.

To the extent practical and consistent with not endangering public safety or inhibiting recovery efforts, state and local officers and workers and government agencies shall allow emergency response broadcasters access to an area affected by an emergency for the purpose of restoring, repairing, or resupplying any facility or equipment critical to the ability of a broadcaster to acquire, produce, and transmit essential public information programming, including, without limitation, repairing and maintaining transmitters and generators and transporting fuel for generators.

No emergency response broadcaster shall access an area affected by an emergency for the purpose of creating audio or video program content or transmitting information to the public.

Acts 2014, ch. 730, § 3; T.C.A. § 58-2-134.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from § 58-2-134 to § 58-2-128 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning emergency preparedness, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 730.

Acts 2014, ch. 730 § 1 provided that this act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Emergency Response Broadcasters Act.”